Illinois, session 104th, HB1180.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly:  4    Section 5. The Illinois Public Labor Relations Act is 5amended by changing Section 1 as follows: 6    (5 ILCS 315/1)  (from Ch. 48, par. 1601)7    Sec. 1. This Act shall be known and and may be cited as the 8"Illinois Public Labor Relations Act".9(Source: P.A. 83-1012.)